local/apertium-tr-az/apertium-tr-az.az.dix.xml
      <pardef n="ağla/maq__vblex">
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>yaram</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>yarammı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>maram</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>marammı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>yarsan</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>yarsanmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazsan</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazsanmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>yar</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>yarmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>maz</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>yarıq</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>yarıqmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>marıq</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>marıqmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>yarsınız</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>yarsınızmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazsınız</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazsınızmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>yarlar</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>yarlarmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="aff"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazlar</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="stat"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
        <e>
          <p>
            <l>mazlarmı</l>
            <r>maq<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pres"/><s n="int"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
          </p>
        </e>
      </pardef>
